Alaska statutes. Title 8. Business and Professions.
Article 2. Marital and Family Therapy Licenses.

Administrative Code. —

For licensing requirements, see 12 AAC 19, art. 1.

For license renewal and continuing education, see 12 AAC 19, art. 3.

Sec. 08.63.100.
Qualifications for license to practice.

The board shall issue a license to practice marital and family therapy to a person who

applies on a form provided by the board;

pays the fee established under AS

08.01.065

;

furnishes evidence satisfactory to the board that the person

has not engaged in conduct that is a ground for imposing disciplinary sanctions under AS

08.63.210

;

holds a master’s degree or doctorate in marital and family therapy or allied mental health field from a regionally accredited educational institution approved by the board for which the person completed a course of study that included instruction substantially equivalent to the following:

three courses or nine semester or 12 quarter hours of course work in marital and family therapy;

three courses or nine semester or 12 quarter hours of course work in marital and family studies;

three courses or nine semester or 12 quarter hours of course work in human development;

one course or three semester or four quarter hours of course work in professional studies or professional ethics and law;

one course or three semester or four quarter hours of course work in research; and

one year of supervised clinical practice in marital and family therapy;

after receiving a degree described in (B) of this paragraph, has practiced supervised marital and family therapy, including 1,700 hours of clinical contact with couples, individuals, and families; the 1,700 hours of clinical contact must include at least 100 hours of individual supervision and 100 hours of group supervision approved by the board; the 100 hours of individual supervision and 100 hours of group supervision may be conducted by one or more supervisors;

has received training related to domestic violence; and

has passed a written or oral examination administered by the board.

Under regulations adopted by the board, a person who holds a master’s or doctorate degree in marital and family therapy or allied mental health field from a regionally accredited educational institution approved by the board, but whose course of degree study did not include all the courses or clinical practice requirements set out in (a)(3)(B) of this section may substitute post-degree courses or practice, as approved by the board, to satisfy the requirements of (a)(3)(B) of this section.

An applicant who fails an examination given under this section may not retake the examination for a period of six months from the date of the examination that the applicant failed.

A license issued under this section shall be renewed biennially by the applicant on a date set by the department and approved by the board. It shall be renewed by payment of the fee established under AS

08.01.065

and by satisfaction of the continuing education requirements established by the board for the renewal of licenses issued under this section.

History.

(§ 1 ch 129 SLA 1992; am § 3 ch 152 SLA 2003; am § 1 ch 75 SLA 2018)

Administrative Code. —

For occupational licensing fees, see 12 AAC 2, art. 2.

For licensing requirements, see 12 AAC 19, art. 1.

For supervised practice, see 12 AAC 19, art. 2.

For license renewal and continuing education, see 12 AAC 19, art. 3.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective January 1, 2019, rewrote (a)(3)(C).

Sec. 08.63.110.
License for supervised practice.

The board shall issue a four-year license for the supervised practice of marital and family therapy to a person who meets the requirements of AS

08.63.100(a)(1)

, (2), and (3)(A) — (B).

A licensee under this section may practice only

under the direct supervision of a supervisor approved by the board under AS

08.63.120

; and

in a clinic, social service agency, or other setting approved by the board.

A license for supervised practice expires four years from the date of issuance and may not be renewed.

A licensee under this section shall submit to the board for its approval a proposed plan for satisfying the supervision requirements of AS

08.63.100(a)(3)(C)

.

A licensee under this section shall use the title “marital therapy associate,” “family therapy associate,” or other title that is approved by the board.

The board shall revoke a license for supervised practice if the person fails the examination required under AS

08.63.100

two or more times.

History.

(§ 1 ch 129 SLA 1992)

Administrative Code. —

For occupational licensing fees, see 12 AAC 2, art. 2.

For supervised practice, see 12 AAC 19, art. 2.

Sec. 08.63.120.
Authorized supervisors.

A person may not supervise a person under this chapter unless approved by the board to be a supervisor.

A person who supervises a licensee under this section during

individual supervision must

have practiced marital and family therapy for five years;

be licensed under this chapter; and

meet the minimum standards established by the board for approved supervisors; or

group supervision must be licensed to practice as

a professional counselor under AS 08.29;

a marital and family therapist under this chapter;

a physician under AS 08.64 who is a psychiatrist;

an advanced practice registered nurse under AS 08.68 who is certified to provide psychiatric or mental health services by an entity recognized by the Board of Nursing;

a psychologist under AS 08.86; or

a clinical social worker under AS 08.95.

History.

(§ 1 ch 129 SLA 1992; am § 2 ch 75 SLA 2018)

Administrative Code. —

For licensing requirements, see 12 AAC 19, art. 1.

For supervised practice, see 12 AAC 19, art. 2.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective January 1, 2019, added “during” at the end of the introductory language in (b), added “individual supervision” at the beginning of the introductory language in (b)(1), added (b)(2), and made related changes.

Sec. 08.63.130.
Temporary license for the practice of marital and family therapy.

The board shall issue a temporary license for the practice of marital and family therapy to an applicant who satisfies the requirements of AS

08.63.100(a)(1)

, (2), and (3)(A), (B), and (C) and has been approved by the board to take the marital and family therapy examination.

A person may practice under a temporary license until the board issues the results of the first marital and family therapy examination given after issuance of the person’s temporary license and either issues or denies a license under AS

08.63.100

to the person.

If a licensee under this section fails the marital and family therapy examination, the board may not renew the person’s temporary license.

History.

(§ 1 ch 129 SLA 1992)

Cross references. —

For temporary courtesy licenses, see AS

08.01.062

.

Administrative Code. —

For occupational licensing fees, see 12 AAC 2, art. 2.

Sec. 08.63.140.
Licensure by credentials.

The board shall issue a license to practice marital and family therapy to a person who

is licensed or certified for the practice of marital and family therapy in another state that has requirements for the license or certificate that are substantially equal to or greater than the requirements of this state; and

meets the requirements of AS

08.63.100(a)(1)

, (2), and (3)(A).

History.

(§ 1 ch 129 SLA 1992)

Administrative Code. —

For occupational licensing fees, see 12 AAC 2, art. 2.

For licensing requirements, see 12 AAC 19, art. 1.